Tennessee, session 114, SB2104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-206, is amended by deleting
"ninety (90) or fewer days" and substituting "ninety-five (95) or fewer days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2104
011297
- 1 -